District of Columbia statutes.
16-542

Issuance of attachment after judgment; costs.

An attachment may be issued upon a judgment either before or after or at the same time with a fieri facias. If costs are unnecessarily multiplied thereby they shall be charged to the party causing the attachment to be issued.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-542.
1973 Ed., § 16-542.